Colorado statutes. TITLE 35 Agriculture
PART 3
ADVERTISING AND SALE

Editor's note:

This part 3 was added in 1989. It was repealed in 2009 and was subsequently recreated and reenacted in 2016, resulting in the addition, relocation, or elimination of sections as well as subject matter. For amendments to this part 3 prior to 2009, consult the 2008 Colorado Revised Statutes and the Colorado statutory research explanatory note beginning on page vii in the front of this volume.

35-33-301. Sale of poultry - labeling - rules.

A poultry producer exempted under this article 33 may sell poultry to individuals. A poultry producer licensed under this article 33 may sell poultry to retail food establishments licensed pursuant to section 25-4-1606 and to individuals.

The department shall consult with the department of public health and environment to promulgate rules regarding the labeling of poultry sold pursuant to this section.

The commissioner or his or her designee shall convene a stakeholder group, including representatives from the Colorado department of public health and environment, retail food establishments, liability insurance companies, poultry farmers, poultry suppliers, processors operating under this article, and any other interested party.

The department shall keep and maintain a list of stakeholders.

The department shall convene the first meeting with the stakeholders no later than July 1, 2016, and as needed thereafter.

The department shall meet with the stakeholders to develop a regulatory framework for the processing of poultry that is sold to retail food establishments, as defined in section 25-4-1602 (14), C.R.S.

On or before November 30, 2016, the commissioner or his or her designee shall prepare a report of the findings and conclusions of the study and shall present the report to all stakeholders and others upon request.

Source:

L. 2016:

Entire part RC&RE, (SB 16-058), ch. 158, p. 501, § 9, effective May 4.

L. 2018:

(1) amended, (HB 18-1235), ch. 208, p. 1340, § 3, effective July 1.